South Dakota, session 2026, HB1168.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
An owner of property that is subject to taxation pursuant to chapter 10-4 may
receive a property tax credit to be applied toward the taxes levied on the property by the
school district in which the property is located. The reduction is based on education
expenses the owner has incurred for any child who is:
(1) At least five years old, but younger than nineteen years; and
(2) A kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade student in this state enrolled in a nonpublic
school.
The child, for which education expenses are incurred, is not required to be a child
of the owner of the property for a tax credit to be received pursuant to this Act.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
Only nonpublic school tuition qualifies as an eligible education expense for which a
property tax credit may be received pursuant to this Act.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
The amount of the property tax credit received under this Act by any property
owner in any year may not exceed the lesser of:
(1) Eighty percent of the total amount of school district taxes owed to that school
district by the owner for that year; or
(2) One thousand dollars.
The amount of property tax credits received by an individual property owner or by
multiple property owners, pursuant to this Act, for incurred eligible education expenses,
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.431.24 2 1168
for any individual child in any year may not exceed the per student equivalent set forth in
§ 13-13-10.1.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
To apply for a property tax credit pursuant to this Act, a property owner shall, prior
to June first, submit an application to the county director of equalization.
The application must be on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue. The
application must:
(1) Include for each child on whose behalf eligible education expenses were incurred:
(a) The school enrollment information; and
(b) Verification of the tuition charges by each child's nonpublic school; and
(2) Be signed by the property owner, under penalty of perjury.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
The property tax bill sent to each taxpayer pursuant to § 10-21-1.1 must reflect
any property tax credits received pursuant to this Act.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
For purposes of determining local effort under chapters 13-13 and 13-37, a
property tax credit issued under this Act is deducted from the local effort in the district in
which the property is located.
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
The Department of Revenue shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, to
specify the forms and procedures for filing and processing requests for property tax credits
under this Act and the documentation that is necessary to verify the eligible education
expenses.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.